Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2294
Department; access to premises.

In administering the Pseudorabies Control and Eradication Act, the agents and employees of the department shall have access to any premises where livestock may be for purposes of the pseudorabies surveillance testing program or when the department has reasonable cause to believe that infected or exposed livestock are present on the premises.

Laws 1986, LB 775, § 29;

Laws 1990, LB 1004, § 41;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 54-2229;

Laws 1991, LB 359, § 60;

Laws 1996, LB 965, § 14.